Illinois, session 104th, HB288.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Forestry Development Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (525 ILCS 15/1)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 9101)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Illinois Forestry Development Act".9(Source: P.A. 83-446.)